fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-I-osasakay_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lotôkup

Tests:
  
  Noun - oskasâkay - ok : # -m animate noun, new coat/dress AEW NA2
     oskasâkay+N+I+Sg: oskasâkay
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nitôskasâkay
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg: kitôskasâkay
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg: nitôskasâkânân
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg: kitôskasâkânaw
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg: kitôskasâkâwâw

     oskasâkay+N+I+Pl: oskasâkaya
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nitôskasâkaya
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl: kitôskasâkaya
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl: nitôskasâkânâna
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl: kitôskasâkânawa
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl: kitôskasâkâwâwa
     
     oskasâkay+N+I+Loc: oskasâkâhk
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px1Sg+Loc: nitôskasâkâhk
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px2Sg+Loc: kitôskasâkâhk
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px1Pl+Loc: nitôskasâkânâhk
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px21Pl+Loc: kitôskasâkânâhk
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px2Pl+Loc: kitôskasâkâwâhk
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px3Sg+Loc: otôskasâkâhk
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px3Pl+Loc: otôskasâkâwâhk
     oskasâkay+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Loc: otôskasâkâyihk

     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg:           [oskasâkâs,       oskasâkâsis]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg:     [nicôskasâkâs,     nicôskasâkâsis]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Sg:     [kicôskasâkâs,     kicôskasâkâsis]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Sg:     [nicôskasâkâsinân, nicôskasâkâsisinân]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Sg:    [kicôskasâkâsinaw, kicôskasâkâsisinaw]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Sg:     [kicôskasâkâsiwâw, kicôskasâkâsisiwâw]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg:     [ocôskasâkâs,      ocôskasâkâsis]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Sg:     [ocôskasâkâsiwâw,  ocôskasâkâsisiwâw]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Sg:  [ocôskasâkâsiyiw,  ocôskasâkâsisiyiw]
               
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Pl:           [oskasâkâsa,       oskasâkâsisa]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl:     [nicôskasâkâsa,     nicôskasâkâsisa]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Sg+Pl:     [kicôskasâkâsa,     kicôskasâkâsisa]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Pl+Pl:     [nicôskasâkâsinâna, nicôskasâkâsisinâna]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px21Pl+Pl:    [kicôskasâkâsinawa, kicôskasâkâsisinawa]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px2Pl+Pl:     [kicôskasâkâsiwâwa, kicôskasâkâsisiwâwa]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl:     [ocôskasâkâsa,      ocôskasâkâsisa]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Pl+Pl:     [ocôskasâkâsiwâwa,  ocôskasâkâsisiwâwa]
     oskasâkay+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px4Sg/Pl+Pl:  [ocôskasâkâsiyiwa,  ocôskasâkâsisiyiwa]

     
     
     
